Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB702.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 67.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In all counties with a land area of more than seven hundred fifty (750) square
miles, the sheriff and county clerk, when authorized by resolution of the fiscal
court, may each maintain a branch office in any incorporated or unincorporated city
of the county other than the county seat.
(2) The sheriff and county clerk, when authorized by the fiscal court, may appoint one
(1) or more deputies for the branch office. The salaries to be paid the[said] deputies,
together with the office rent and other expenses incidental to maintaining branch
offices, shall be considered as a part of the necessary expenses of the respective
officers and shall be paid in the manner now provided by law for those[such]
expenses.
(3) Branch offices as authorized by the fiscal court may be used for the same purposes
as those for which the offices at the county seat are used; provided, however, that
all records must be kept at the county seat. The period of time the[such] branch
offices shall be maintained, and the office hours, shall be fixed by the fiscal court.
The compensation of the deputy in charge of the branch office shall be fixed in the
same manner as the compensation of deputies serving at the county seat office. The
sheriff and county clerk shall remain liable on their bonds for all funds collected by
the branch offices.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/20/2026 8:24 AM Jacketed